Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.371

Becoming general partner.

A person becomes a general partner:

(1) As provided in the partnership agreement;

(2) Under RCW 25.10.571(3)(b) following the dissociation of a limited partnership's last general partner;

(3) As the result of a conversion or merger under article 11 of this chapter; or

(4) With the consent of all the partners.

[ 2009 c 188 s 401.]